src/fst/morphology/stems/kawe-verb-stems.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in Mohawk language are actions.
!! -----------------------VERBS ---------------------------------------

LEXICON VerbStem
<0:rootStart>   VerbRoots   ;

LEXICON VerbRoots

 !! to hear smth, p. 11
< {athonte}:{athón:te'n} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" 0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{athonte}:{athón:te's} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{athonte}:{athón:te'ne'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:punctSuf "@U.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{athonte}:{athonté:'on} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;


<{ehyahron} "@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to raise, grow, p 1

!! to sleep, p. 12
< {itahw}:{itahw} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" 0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{itahw}:{itahs} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{itahw}:{itahwe'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:punctSuf "@U.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{itahw}:{itá:'on} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;



! to like the taste, p.13
< {ekahw}:{ekahw} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" 0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{ekahw}:{ekahs} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{ekahw}:{ekahwe'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:punctSuf "@U.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{ekahw}:{eka'on} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;

 
!<{itehr} "@P.CC.Two@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to pity smb, p. 21

< {itehr}:{í:tehr} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@" 0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{itehr}:{itèn:ras} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{itehr}:{í:tenhre'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:punctSuf "@U.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{itehr}:{itèn:ron} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;

!! to pile, to stack smth
< {i'tenhyot}:{i'tenhyó:ten} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" 0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{i'tenhyot}:{i'tenhyó:tha} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Red@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{i'tenhyot}:{i'tenhyó:ten'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Red@"  0:punctSuf "@U.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{i'tenhyot}:{'tèn:yote} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Red@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;



<{ken} "@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to see smb, p. 18

<{khonni} "@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to cook, p 1

<{onni} "@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to make smth, p. 5

!! rohrok, to watch smb, p. 19
< {rohrok}:{aterò:rok} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@" 0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{rohrok}:{aterò:roks} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{rohrok}:{aterò:roke'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:punctSuf "@U.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{rohrok}:{aterò:ron} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect; 


!! to work, p. 10
< {yo'ten}:{yo'ten} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" 0:commandSuf "@U.Aspect.Command@" %+Command:0 >   EndAspect;
<{yo'ten}:{yo'ten's} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:habSuf "@U.Aspect.Habitual@" %+Habitual:0>   EndAspect; 
<{yo'ten}:{yo'ten'} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:punctSuf "@U.Aspect.Punct@" %+Punct:0 >   EndAspect; 
<{yo'ten}:{yo'tén:'on} "@P.CC.Except@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@"  0:perfSuf "@U.Aspect.Perf@" %+Perf:0 >   EndAspect;
